Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-415
Legislative Council; members; expenses.

The members of the council shall be compensated for actual expenses incurred while attending sessions of the council and the members of any committee of the council shall be compensated for actual expenses incurred while on business of the committee as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 11, p. 424;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-511;

R.S.1943, § 50-415;

Laws 1951, c. 169, § 3, p. 655;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 90.